Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.520

Policies to support children of incarcerated parents.

(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall review current policies and assess the adequacy and availability of programs targeted at children who have a parent who is incarcerated in a department of corrections facility. The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt policies that support the children of incarcerated parents and meet their needs with the goal of facilitating normal child development, including maintaining adequate academic progress, while reducing intergenerational incarceration.

(2) To the extent funds are available, the superintendent shall conduct the following activities to assist in implementing the requirements of subsection (1) of this section:

(a) Gather information and data on the students who are the children of inmates incarcerated in department of corrections facilities; and

(b) Participate in the children of incarcerated parents advisory committee and report information obtained under this section to the advisory committee.

[ 2009 c 578 s 9; 2007 c 384 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 384: See note following RCW 72.09.495.